ps_rules
// This ur_rules file is written by Muhammad yousaf (Afghanistan).
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
//  phoneme rules for Pashto

// vowel 
.L01 ا و ه ي ې

// Consonants
.L02  ب ت ټ ث ج ح خ د ذ ړ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ څ ځ ڼ پ ئ ښ ۍ‌‌ ؤ  ژ ‌‌ډ  ږ چ غ ع ف ق ک ګ م ن ی ل 

// all alphabets
.L03  ب ت ټ ث ج ح خ د ړ ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ څ ځ ڼ پ ئ ښ ۍ ژ ‌‌ډ  ږ چ غ ؤ ع ف ق ک ګ م ن ی ل ا آ و ه ي ې

// all which can occur at the start mid and end
.L04	ب ت ټ ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ړ ز س ش ص ض ط ظ څ ځ ڼ پ ئ ښ ژ ‌‌ډ  ږ چ غ ؤ ع ف ق ک ګ م ن ل ا و ه ي آ
// all without ا آ
.L05  ب ت ټ ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ړ ز س ش ص ض ط ظ څ ځ ڼ پ ئ ښ ۍ ژ ‌‌ډ  ږ چ غ ؤ ع ف ق ک ګ م ن ی ل و ه ي ې

.L06 ا

// replacing unknown characters
.replace
		٠	0
		۰	0
		۱	1
		١	1
		٢	2
		۲	2
		٣	3
		۳	3
		٤	4
		۴	4
		٥	5
		۵	5
		٦	6
		۶	6
		٧	7
		۷	7
		٨	8
		۸	8
		٩	9
		۹	9
		٬	،
		٫	،
		٪	%
		
		
		
		// Urdu for Persian users added
			ٹ	ټ
			ڈ	ډ
			ڑ	ړ
			ہ	ه
			ﮩ	ه
			ﮨ	ه
			ے	ی
			ں	ن
			ۃ	ت
			ۂ	ه
			ۓ	ی
			ﮒ	ګ

// VOWELS

.group آ
	آ	a:
	_) آ	a:
.group ا
	ا	a:
	_) ا	a
	_) او	o:
	ا (_	a:
	_) او (_	aw
	_ا) ا	a
	L04) ا (L03	a:
	_L04) ا (L03	a:
	_L04) ا (L03_	a:
	L04) ا (L03	a:
	// suffixes
	ان (_	a:n
	او (_	AU
	اند (_	and
	انو (_	a:no
	انه (_	a:n@
	اوس	os	
.group ب
	ب 	b
	_) ب (L01	b
	_) ب (L02	ba
	L03) ب (L01	b
	ب (_	b
	_) بد	bad
	_) بې	be
	_) با	ba:
	_) بيا	bja:
	 به	b@	
	 باندې	ba:nde
	 باید	ba:jad
	 
	 
.group پ
           پ          p
           پ (_      p
        _) پ (L02	pa
	‫_)پرې	pRe
	L03) پ (L01	p
	پر	p@R
	‫_) پر (ې	pR
	_) پ(ه_	p@	
	پاله(_	pa:la
	_) پورې	poRe
	_) پرا	pRa:
	_)پرې	pRe
	پالنه (_	pa:l@na
.group ت
	ت            t
        _) ت (L02	ta
           ت (_	t
	‬_) ت (ه_	t@
		L03) ت (L01	t
	تر	t@R
	توب(_	tob
	تیا(_	tja:
	تون(_	tun
	تاسو	ta:so
	_) ته (_	t@	
		
.group ټ
	ټ          t.
        _) ټ (L02	t.a
           ټ (_	t.
           ټ (L01	t.
	L03) ټ (L01	t.
	 ټ (ر_	t.a
.group ث
           ث          s
           ث (_        s
       _) ث (L02	s
         L03) ث (L01	s
.group ج
           ج           J
           ج (L01 	 J
           ج (_        J
       _) ج (L02	Ja     
       L03) ج (L01	J
          جن(_	J@n
.group چ
	چ	c
	چ (L01	c
       _) چ (L02	ca
           چ (_        c
       // L03) چ (L01	c
         چي(_	ci
         چک(_	cak          
.group ح
	ح	H
	ح (L01	H
       _) ح (L02	Ha
           ح (_        H
.group خ
	خ	x
	خ (L01	x
       _) خ (L02	xa
           خ (_        x
.group څ
	څ	ts
	څ (L01	ts
       _) څ (L02	tsa
           څ (_        ts
.group ځ
	ځ	dz
	ځ (L01	dz
       _) ځ (L02	dza
           ځ (_        dz
           ځی (_	dzaI
.group د
	د	d
	د (L01	d
       _) د (L02	da
           د (_        d
       _) دۀ (_	d@
       _) ده (_	d@
       _) دوه	dva
.group ډ
	ډ	d.
	ډ (L01	d.
       _) ډ (L02	d.a
           ډ (_        d.
           ډله (_	d.ala
.group ذ
	ذ	z
	ذ (L01	z
       _) ذ (L02	za
           ذ (_        z
.group ر
	ر	R
	ر (L01	R
       _) ر (L02	Ra
           ر (_        R
.group ړ
	ړ	r.
	ړ (L01	r.
       _) ړ (L02	r.a
           ړ (_        r. 
.group ز
	ز	z
	ز (L01	z
       _) ز (L02	za
           ز (_        z
       _) زه (_	z@
           ز (م	zm
.group ژ
	ژ	Z
	ژ (L01	Z
       _) ژ (L02	Za
           ژ (_        Z
.group ږ
	ږ	J^
	ږ (L01	J^
       _) ږ (L02	J^a
           ږ (_        J^
.group س
	س	s
	س (L01	s
       _) س (L02	sa
           س (_        s
        _)ستا	sta:
.group ش
	ش	S
	ش (L01	S
       _) ش (L02	Sa
           ش (_        S
	
.group ښ
	ښ	C
	ښ (L01	C
       _) ښ (L02	Ca
           ښ (_        C
          ښت(_	@Ct
.group ص
	ص	s
	ص (L01	s
       _) ص (L02	sa
           ص (_        s
.group ض
	ض	z
	ض (L01	z
       _) ض (L02	za
           ض (_        z
.group ط
	ط	t
	ط (L01	t
       _) ط (L02	ta
           ط (_        t
.group ظ
	ظ	z.
	ظ (L01	z.
       _) ظ (L02	z.a
           ظ (_        z.
.group ع
           ع           ?
           ع (L01	?
       _) ع (L02	?a
           ع (_        ?
.group غ
	غ	Q
	غ (L01	Q
       _) غ (L02	Qa
           غ (_        Q
           غاړی (_	Qa:r.aI
           غاړې (_	Qa:re
.group ف
	ف	f
	ف (L01	f
       _) ف (L02	fa
           ف (_        f
.group ق
	ق	q
	ق (L01	q
       _) ق (L02	qa
           ق (_        q
.group ک
	ک	k
	ک (L01	k
       _) ک (L02	ka
           ک (_        k
.group ګ
	ګ	g
	ګ (L01	g
       _) ګ (L02	ga
           ګ (_        g
           ګان (_	ga:n
           ګانو (_	ga:no
           ګانې (_	ga:ne
           ګلوي (_	galvi
           ګر (_	g@R
           ګوټی (_	got.aI
           ګنۍ (_	gan@I
.group ل
	ل	l
	ل (L01	l
       _) ل (L02	la
           ل (_        l
.group م
	م	m
	م (L01	m
       _) م (L02	ma
           م (_        m
           من (_	man
.group ن
	ن	n
	ن (L01	n
       _) ن (L02	na
           ن (_        n
       _) نا	na:  
.group ڼ
	ڼ	n.
	ڼ (L01	n.
       _) ڼ (L02	n.a
           ڼ (_        n.
.group و
	و	o:
	_) و	va
	L01) و (L01	v
	L02) و (L02	u:
	وو	vu
	و (_ 	o:
	و (ه_ 	v
	و (ل_	 va
	ونه (_	u:na
	ونو (_	u:no
	وې (_	ve
	وو (_	vo
	ور (_	vaR
	ون (_	un
	وال (_	wa:l
	والا (_	wa:la:
	وزمه (_	vazma
	وړ (_	var.
	وړه (_	var.a
.group ه
	_الل) ه (_+++	h
	_) ه	ha
	ه	h
	ه (_ 	a
	هار (_	ha:r
	
.group ی	
	ی	aI
	ی (_	aI

.group ي
	ي	j
	ي (_	i:
	ي (L01	j
	_) ي	ja
	يو	Jav
	_)يو	Jav
	يان(_	ja:n
	يانو(_	ja:no	
	يانې (_	ja:ne
	يزه (_	iza 
	يز (_	iz 
	ييز (_	jiz
	ييزه (_	jiza
	ين (_	in

.group ئ
	ئ	@I
	ئ (_	@I

.group ې
	ې	e
	ې (_	e
	L03) ې 	e
	
.group ۍ
	ۍ	@I
	ۍ (_	@I

.group وی
	وی(_	oI
	L03) وی (_	oI
	
.group او
	L03) او (_	AU

	
